California, session 20252026, AB2581.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 50158 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:50158. (a) By January 1, 2028, the Department of Housing and Community Development and the California Housing Finance Agency shall develop and implement strategies to promote the movement of tenants of deed-restricted affordable housing into homeownership home ownership through existing homeownership home ownership programs implemented by the department or the agency.(b) The strategies developed and implemented pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, advertising of existing home ownership programs to tenants of deed-restricted affordable housing.(c) For the purposes of this section, “existing home ownership programs” shall include, but not be limited to, any of the following:(1) The Joe Serna, Jr. Farmworker Housing Grant Program established pursuant to Chapter 3.2 (commencing with Section 50515.2) of Part 2.(2) The CalHome Program established pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 50650) of Part 2.(3) The home purchase assistance program established pursuant to Chapter 6.8 (commencing with Section 51341) of Part 3.(4) The California Dream for All Program established pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 51520) of Part 3.